Colorado statutes. TITLE 6 Consumer and Commercial Affairs
ARTICLE 21
PROTECTION AGAINST FINANCIAL EXPLOITATION

6-21-101 to 6-21-103. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article repealed, (SB 13-111), ch. 233, p. 1128, § 17, effective May 16.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 2010 and was not amended prior to its repeal in 2013. For the text of this article prior to 2013, consult the 2012 Colorado Revised Statutes.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2013 act repealing this article, see section 1 of chapter 233, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.